Utah statutes.
34-40-204.   Criminal penalty -- Enforcement.

(1) (a)  Repeated violation of this chapter is a class B misdemeanor.

(b)  "Repeated violations" does not include separate violations as to individual employees arising out of the same investigation or enforcement action.

(2)  Upon the third violation by the same employer within a three-year period, the commission may prosecute a criminal action in the name of the state.

(3)  The county attorney, district attorney, or attorney general shall provide assistance in prosecutions under this section at the request of the commission.

